Hawaii statutes.
[§305J-6]
Department's powers and authority. (a) The
department shall administer the provisions of this chapter and any
administrative rules, policies, and procedures adopted by the director.

(b)
To administer this chapter, the department shall:

(1) Maintain a list of the private colleges or
universities, seminaries, and religious training institutions that have been
authorized and make this list available to the public;

(2) Maintain a list of the states with which the
director has entered into a post-secondary education authorization reciprocity
agreement and make this list available to the public; and

(3) Receive, arbitrate, investigate, and process
complaints.

(c) In
conducting an investigation, the department may physically inspect the private
college or university, seminary, or religious training institution's facilities
and records, and the institution shall have an affirmative duty to cooperate
with requests from the department for information regarding any investigation
or inspection.

(d) In administering its responsibilities, the
department may assess fees sufficient to provide for the self-sufficiency of
the program pursuant to section 26-9(o). [L 2013, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next